Washington statutes.
RCW 11.118.110

Application of chapter.

This chapter applies to trusts that are created on or after July 22, 2001, and to trusts that are in existence on July 22, 2001, but that are revocable by the trustor on July 22, 2001. If a trustor is incompetent to exercise a power of revocation on July 22, 2001, this chapter does not apply to such trust unless the trustor later becomes competent to exercise such power of revocation, in which case this chapter applies to such trust.

[ 2001 c 327 s 13.]